Utah statutes.
62A-11-101.   Legislative intent -- Liberal construction.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the integrity of the public assistance programs of this state be maintained and that the taxpayers support only those persons in need and only as a resource of last resort. To this end, this part should be liberally construed.

